Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 4 Precincts Using Vote Recorders

21-2-470 through 21-2-473.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 12a; Code 1933, § 34-1335, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 16; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1053, § 10; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 599, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 13, 14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1338, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 38; Ga. L. 1973, p. 175, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 842, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 16; Code 1933, § 34-1329, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1337, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 33; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 30; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1328, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 14; Code 1933, § 34-1336, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1969, p. 308, § 31; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 842, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 51, effective July 1, 2003.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 51 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2003.